ru: Классификация объема посадки: Очень широкая; Большой объем (HV); Малый объем (LV); Средний объем (MV); Узкая; Стандартная; Широкая; Другое
fi: Sopivuuden tilavuusluokitus: Erittäin leveä; Suuri tilavuus (HV); Pieni tilavuus (LV); Keskitilavuus (MV); Kapea; Normaali; Leveä; Muu
zh-CN: 鞋内体积分类: 特宽; 大容量 (HV); 低容积 (LV); 中容积 (MV); 窄型; 标准型; 宽型; 其他
de: Klassifizierung des Passformvolumens: Extrabreit; Hohes Volumen (HV); Geringes Volumen (LV); Mittleres Volumen (MV); Schmal; Regulär; Breit; Sonstige
tr: Uygun hacim sınıflandırması: Ekstra geniş; Yüksek hacim (HV); Düşük hacim (LV); Orta hacim (MV); Dar; Normal; Geniş; Diğer
pt-BR: Classificação de volume de ajuste: Extralargo; Alto volume (HV); Baixo volume (LV); Médio volume (MV); Estreito; Regular; Largo; Outros
zh-TW: 鞋靴內部容積分類: 特寬; 高容積 (HV); 低容積 (LV); 中容積 (MV); 窄版; 一般版型; 寬版; 其他
el: Ταξινόμηση όγκου προσαρμογής: Πολύ φαρδιά; Υψηλού όγκου (HV); Χαμηλού όγκου (LV); Μεσαίου όγκου (MV); Στενή; Κανονική; Φαρδιά; Άλλο
es: Clasificación de volumen de calce: Extra ancho; Alto volumen (HV); Bajo volumen (LV); Volumen medio (MV); Estrecho; Regular; Ancho; Otro
cs: Klasifikace objemu přizpůsobení: Extra široký; Vysoký objem (HV); Nízký objem (LV); Střední objem (MV); Úzký; Běžný; Široký; Jiné
lt-LT: Pritaikymo tūrio klasifikacija: Itin platus; Didelės apimties (HV); Mažos apimties (LV); Vidutinės apimties (MV); Siauras; Įprastas; Platus; Kita
ro-RO: Clasificarea volumului de potrivire: Foarte lat; Volum ridicat (HV); Volum redus (LV); Volum mediu (MV); Îngust; Normal; Lat; Altele
ko: 핏 볼륨 분류: 엑스트라 와이드; 하이 볼륨(HV); 로우 볼륨(LV); 미디엄 볼륨(MV); 내로우; 레귤러; 와이드; 기타
fr: Classe de volume du chaussant: Très large; Volume élevé (HV); Volume faible (LV); Volume moyen (MV); Étroit; Standard; Large; Autre
th: พอดีกับการจำแนกปริมาตร: กว้างพิเศษ; ทรงกว้าง (HV); ทรงแคบ (LV); ทรงมาตรฐาน (MV); แคบ; ปกติ; กว้าง; อื่นๆ
sk-SK: Klasifikácia objemu vnútorného priestoru: Extra široký; Veľký objem (HV); Malý objem (LV); Stredný objem (MV); Úzky; Bežný; Široký; Iné
bg-BG: Класификация на вътрешния обем при прилягане: Много широк; Голям обем (HV); Малък обем (LV); Среден обем (MV); Тесен; Стандартен; Широк; Друго
da: Klassificering af pasformsvolumen: Ekstra bred; Høj volumen (HV); Lav volumen (LV); Medium volumen (MV); Smal; Almindelig; Bred; Andet
nb: Klassifisering av tilpasset volum: Ekstra bred; Høyt volum (HV); Lavt volum (LV); Middels volum (MV); Smal; Normal; Bred; Annet
sl-SI: Klasifikacija prostornine prileganja: Zelo široko; Visok volumen (HV); Nizek volumen (LV); Srednji volumen (MV); Ozko; Običajno; Široko; Drugo
pt-PT: Classificação do volume de ajuste: Extra largo; Volume alto (HV); Volume baixo (LV); Volume médio (MV); Estreito; Normal; Largo; Outro
en: Fit volume classification: Extra wide; High volume (HV); Low volume (LV); Medium volume (MV); Narrow; Regular; Wide; Other
pl: Klasyfikacja objętości dopasowania: Bardzo szerokie; Duża objętość (HV); Mała objętość (LV); Średnia objętość (MV); Wąskie; Zwykłe; Szerokie; Inne
nl: Pasvolumeclassificatie: Extra breed; Hoog volume (HV); Laag volume (LV); Gemiddeld volume (MV); Smal; Normaal; Breed; Overige
vi: Phân loại thể tích bên trong: Cực rộng; Thể tích lớn (HV); Thể tích nhỏ (LV); Thể tích trung bình (MV); Hẹp; Thường; Rộng; Khác
hu: Illesztési térfogat osztályozása: Extra széles; Nagy térfogatú (HV); Kis térfogatú (LV); Közepes térfogatú (MV); Keskeny; Normál; Széles; Egyéb
hr-HR: Klasifikacija volumena po mjeri: Vrlo široko; Visoki volumen (HV); Niski volumen (LV); Srednji volumen (MV); Usko; Obično; Široko; Ostalo
ja: フィットボリューム分類: エクストラワイド; ハイボリューム (HV); ローボリューム (LV); ミディアムボリューム (MV); ナロー; レギュラー; ワイド; その他
sv: Klassificering av passformsvolym: Extra bred; Hög volym (HV); Låg volym (LV); Mellanvolym (MV); Smal; Normal; Bred; Övrigt
it: Classificazione del volume di vestibilità: Extra largo; Volume alto (HV); Volume basso (LV); Volume medio (MV); Stretto; Regolare; Largo; Altro